test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-14ritsjkas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ritsʼkas: # Noun (14) ritsʼkas 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Nom: ritsʼkas
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Gen: ritsʼka
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Par: [ritsʼkast, ritsʼkat]
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Ill: [ritsʼkahe, ritsʼkadõ]
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Ine: [ritsʼkan, ritsʼkah, ritsʼkahn]
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Ela: ritsʼkast
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+All: ritsʼkalõ
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Ade: ritsʼkal
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Abl: ritsʼkalt
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Tra: ritsʼkas
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Ter: ritsʼkaniq
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Abe: ritsʼkaldaq
     ritsʼkas+N+Sg+Com: ritsʼkagaq
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Nom: ritsʼkaq
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Gen: [ritsʼkidõ, ritsʼkiidõ, ritsʼkastõ]
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Par: [ritsʼkit, ritsʼkiid]
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Ill: [ritsʼkihe, ritsʼkiihe, ritsʼkidõ, ritsʼkiidõ, ritsʼkastõhe, ritsʼkastõdõ]
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Ine: [ritsʼkin, ritsʼkiin, ritsʼkih, ritsʼkiih, ritsʼkihn, ritsʼkiihn, ritsʼkastõn, ritsʼkastõh, ritsʼkastõhn]
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Ela: [ritsʼkist, ritsʼkiist, ritsʼkastõst]
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+All: [ritsʼkilõ, ritsʼkiilõ, ritsʼkastõlõ]
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Ade: [ritsʼkil, ritsʼkiil, ritsʼkastõl]
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Abl: [ritsʼkilt, ritsʼkiilt, ritsʼkastõlt]
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Tra: [ritsʼkis, ritsʼkiis, ritsʼkastõs]
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Ter: [ritsʼkiniq, ritsʼkiiniq, ritsʼkastõniq]
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Abe: [ritsʼkildaq, ritsʼkiildaq, ritsʼkastõldaq]
     ritsʼkas+N+Pl+Com: [ritsʼkidõgaq, ritsʼkiidõgaq, ritsʼkastõgaq]
